Washington statutes.
RCW 44.39.060

Examinations—Subpoenas—Depositions—Contempt proceedings—Witness fees.

In the discharge of any duty imposed by this chapter, the committee or any personnel acting under its direction shall have the authority to examine and inspect all properties, equipment, facilities, files, records, and accounts of any state office, department, institution, board, committee, commission, or agency; to administer oaths; and to issue subpoenas, upon approval of a majority of the members of the house or senate rules committee, to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of any papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony, and to cause the deposition of witnesses, either residing within or without the state, to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for taking depositions in civil actions in the superior courts.

In case of the failure of any person to comply with any subpoena issued in behalf of the committee, or on the refusal of any witness to testify to any matters regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, it shall be the duty of the superior court of any county, or of the judge thereof, on application of the committee, to compel obedience by proceedings for contempt, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from such court or a refusal to testify therein.

Each witness who appears before the committee by its order, other than a state official or employee, shall receive for his or her attendance the fees and mileage provided for witnesses in civil cases in courts of record, which shall be audited and paid upon the presentation of proper vouchers signed by such witness and approved by the chair of the committee.

[ 2010 c 8 s 8001; 2009 c 549 s 6016; 1977 ex.s. c 328 s 17.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 328: See note following RCW 43.21G.010.